Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 1. General Provisions Relative to Public Contracts

§ 31-1-1.
Contracts for printing, binding, etc.

The responsibility for the making of contracts for printing, binding, engraving and lithographing is hereby vested in each state agency or office which requires such printing, binding, engraving and lithographing, including but not restricted to the Secretary of State, State Department of Education, State Tax Commission, Supreme Court, Department of Insurance, State Auditor, Public Service Commission, State Treasurer, State Fiscal Management Board, State Veterans Affairs Board, Attorney General, Department of Agriculture and Commerce, State Board of Pharmacy, State Board of Dental Examiners, State Law Library, State Board of Health, Mississippi Department of Corrections, State Educational Finance Commission, Department of Archives and History, Mississippi State Hospital and Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.

All contracts referred to herein shall be submitted to and approved by the State Fiscal Management Board prior to their execution, except that those contracts under the jurisdiction of the Legislature shall be submitted to and approved by the Legislative Budget Office.

All state agencies shall purchase all commodities required for their operation or for the proper fulfillment of their duties and functions in accordance with Chapter 7 of this title in order to coordinate and promote efficiency and economy in the purchase of such commodities for the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8961-01, 8961-04; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, §§ 1, 29; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 24; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 193; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 15; Laws, 1987, ch. 461, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1987).

§ 31-1-2.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 461, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1987).

§31-1-2. [En Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 14]

§ 31-1-3.
Duties vested in Secretary of State.

Any other duties and powers heretofore vested in the former office of board of public contracts and not specifically transferred to a specific state agency or office or specifically repealed are transferred to and vested in the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8961-03; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 31-1-5.
Kinds of paper to be used.

The paper for printing the acts of the Legislature, journals, all pamphlets, department reports, messages, and the like shall be of good quality of a standard book paper of not less than fifty (50) pounds to the ream, and for bills, blanks, circulars, and the like to be of good bond of not less than sixteen (16) pounds to the ream.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3296; 1906, § 3752; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6446; 1930, § 5953; 1942, § 8998; Laws, 1935, ch. 33.

§ 31-1-7.
Kinds of type to be used.

The following kinds of type shall be used: The acts of the Legislature shall be set in eight- or ten-point type, solid or leaded, as the Secretary of State may direct; the journals of the Senate and the House shall be set in eight-point type, solid; the department reports, miscellaneous books, pamphlets, and Governor’s messages, and the like shall be set in ten-point, eight-point and/or six-point, or other sizes of type, within the discretion of the Secretary of State. The matters of spacing between paragraphs, and of style and type of marginal or headnotes shall be within the discretion of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3295; 1906, § 3751; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6445; 1930, § 5952; 1942, § 8997; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 31-1-9.
Binding.

Two kinds of binding for books shall be used, to wit: full buckram, or stiff boards with buckram backs, unless otherwise specified and ordered by the Secretary of State.

A number of copies each of the acts and journals of the Legislature and department reports shall be bound in buckram, sufficient for the state and county libraries and colleges and for such other distribution as the law directs. The exact number of copies of each of the foregoing to be thus bound is left within the discretion of the Secretary of State.

All the remaining copies of the acts and journals shall be bound either in full buckram, or in stiff boards with buckram backs, as the Secretary of State may direct.

The messages of the Governor, reports of officers, boards and institutions, and all other pamphlets shall be in paper covers only, except as the Secretary of State, in his discretion, may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3297, 3306-3308; 1906, §§ 3753, 3762-3764; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6447, 6455-6457; 1930, §§ 5954, 5962-5964; 1942, §§ 8999, 9005-9007; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, §§ 11, 16-18.

§ 31-1-11.
Contents of page.

The acts of the Legislature, the journals, department reports, pamphlets, and the like shall be set in type of the respective sizes as provided in Section 31-1-7 and in a style such as economy and good workmanship require, within the discretion and under the direction of the Secretary of State. The type size of the pages of the acts, journals and department reports shall be twenty-six (26) by forty-four (44) pica ems, with a trim size of six (6) by nine (9) inches. Pamphlets and books other than the acts, journals and reports shall be of the same or a more convenient size, within the discretion of the Secretary of State. Blank pages shall not be paid for, and in all cases where unnecessary spaces are left, the Secretary of State, in estimating the number of pages in a job, shall deduct a half page for every unnecessary space.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3298; 1906, § 3754; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6448; 1930, § 5955; 1942, § 9000; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 31-1-13.
No extra charge for collating.

No charge shall be made for counting, folding, stitching, collating, drying, pressing, or other like thing, but all such matter shall be considered as embraced in the printing or binding, as the case may be. The printer or binder, in all instances, is to be understood as obligated to furnish free of cost all paper and material used in the performance of his contract, and to receive and deliver all matter at the capitol.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3301; 1906, § 3757; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6450; 1930, § 5957; 1942, § 9001.

§ 31-1-15.
Number to be printed.

The acts of the Legislature shall be printed in two (2) volumes, one (1) volume containing the public or general acts of the Legislature and the other volume the local and private acts of the Legislature, but for use of state departments the two (2) volumes can be combined. The number of general or public acts of the Legislature, of the local and private acts of the Legislature, of the journals of the Senate and the House of Representatives, of the Governor’s message, and of the reports of officers, boards, and institutions to be printed, severally and respectively, shall be left within the discretion of the Secretary of State; and the Secretary of State may sell at a price, approximately the cost of publication, such copies of the laws and journals as may not be needed in the distribution, now or hereinafter required, and for the use of the Legislature and officers of the state.

The Secretary of State is authorized to dispose of all copies of the laws and journals after having kept same and failed to sell same as is provided by law at the expiration of a period of three (3) years from the date of publication. However, the Secretary of State shall keep a minimum of five (5) copies of each such publication on file in his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3302; 1906, § 3758; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6451; 1930, § 5958; 1942, § 9002; Laws, 1924, ch. 350; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1952, ch. 334; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 13; Laws, 2012, ch. 390, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 31-1-17.
Printing schedule.

The Secretary of State shall furnish to the contractor for printing all of the acts of the Legislature within thirty (30) days after the adjournment thereof. The contractor, within ninety (90) days thereafter, shall print, with the index, and bind all copies of the acts as required by the Secretary of State and deliver same to the said secretary, who may extend the time of the contractor, if necessary.

Within six (6) months after the adjournment of the Legislature, the journals of the two (2) houses shall be printed with the indexes, bound, and delivered to the Secretary of State, unless the time be extended by said Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3303, 3304; 1906, §§ 3759, 3760; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6452, 6453; 1930, §§ 5959, 5960; 1942, §§ 9003, 9004; Laws, 1900, ch. 63; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, §§ 14, 15, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 31-1-19.
Labeling.

The acts of the Legislature shall be labeled “Laws of Mississippi” including the year of their passage, and the label shall indicate whether the laws are “general” or “local and private”; and if enacted at an extraordinary session, the label shall so indicate. The journals of the Legislature shall be labeled “House Journal-Mississippi,” and “Senate Journal-Mississippi,” respectively, and the year of the session shall be indicated thereon; and if for an extraordinary session, the label shall so indicate. The bound copies of the department reports shall be labeled “Department Reports, State of Mississippi,” and the label shall disclose the year covered by the reports.

The department reports consist of the Governor’s message and the annual reports of all offices, boards, commissions, agencies and institutions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3309, 3310; 1906, §§ 3765, 3766; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6458, 6459; 1930, §§ 5965, 5966; 1942, §§ 9008, 9009; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1966, ch. 547, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 1966).

§ 31-1-21.
Contractor’s accounts.

All contractors shall specify each job of work charged for and attach to the account the receipt of the proper officer for the work. The accounts must be accompanied with one copy of each job, of the paper containing the matter charged for, and must state the number of ems or inches and all particulars.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3313; 1906, § 3767; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6460; 1930, § 5967; 1942, § 9010; Laws, 1912, ch. 205; Laws, 1935, ch. 33.

§ 31-1-23.
Department to read proof.

The department for which the work is done shall examine the proof sheets of all work executed under the provisions of this chapter, and see that they are correctly printed and that all such work is executed in a suitable manner and in accordance with the requirements of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3314; 1906, § 3768; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6461; 1930, § 5968; 1942, § 9011; Laws, 1935, ch. 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 31-1-25.
Printing, binding, and stationery.

The purchase of all printing, binding and stationery is hereby defined as a commodity purchase, subject to the provisions of Sections 31-7-1 through 31-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In the event the provisions of this section conflict with the provisions of any laws or parts of laws, the provisions of this section shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9013.5; Laws, 1954, Ex Sess, ch. 29, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 20; Laws, 1973, ch. 368, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1973).

§ 31-1-27.
Certain appraisal records exempt from requirement of public access.

Appraisal information in the possession of a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, which concern the sale or purchase of real or personal property for public purposes prior to public announcement of the purchase or sale, where the release of such records would have a detrimental effect on such sale or purchase, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1983.